Massachusetts, session 194th, H5523.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding Chapter 132B of the General Laws or any other general or special law to
the contrary, the Town of Sharon may by ordinance prohibit the application of second-generation
anticoagulant rodenticides within the Town of Sharon, including application of such pesticides
by licensed commercial applicators as defined in 333 C.M.R. 10.00, except as allowed by the
Board of Health to remediate a public health condition. This act shall take effect upon its
passage.
of 1